California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(C) Requiring resource families to report any incidents consistent with the reporting requirements pursuant to the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(D) Inspecting resource family homes as often as necessary to ensure the quality of care provided.

(8) (A) Investigating all complaints against a resource family and taking action as necessary, including, but not limited to, investigating any incidents reported about a resource family indicating that the approval standard is not being maintained and inspecting the resource family home.

(B) The child’s social worker shall not conduct the investigation into the complaint received concerning a family providing services pursuant to the standards required by subdivision (d). To the extent that adequate resources are available, complaints shall be investigated by a worker who did not conduct the home environment assessment or family evaluation or prepare the written report determining approval of the resource family.

(C) Upon conclusion of the complaint
 investigation, the final disposition shall be reviewed and approved by a supervising staff member.

(D) The department shall be notified of any serious incidents or serious complaints or any incident that falls within the definition of Section 11165.5 of the Penal Code. If those incidents or complaints result in an investigation, the department shall also be notified as to the status and disposition of that investigation.

(9) Performing corrective action as required by the department.

(10) Assessing county performance in related areas of the California Child and Family Services Review System, and remedying problems identified.

(11) Submitting information
 and data that the department determines is necessary to study, monitor, and prepare the update specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (f).

(12) Ensuring resource family applicants and resource families have the necessary knowledge, skills, and abilities to support children of all races, ethnic group identifications, ancestries, national origins, colors, religions, sexes, sexual orientations, gender identities, mental or physical disabilities, or HIV statuses in foster care by completing caregiver training. The training should include a curriculum that supports the role of a resource family in parenting vulnerable children and should be ongoing in order to provide resource families with information on trauma-informed practices and requirements and other topics within the foster care system.

(13) Ensuring that a resource family applicant completes a minimum of 12 hours of preapproval caregiver training. The training shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following courses:

(A) An overview of the child protective and probation systems.

(B) The effects of trauma, including grief and loss, and child abuse and neglect, on child development and behavior, and methods to behaviorally support children impacted by that trauma or child abuse and neglect.

(C) Positive discipline and the importance of self-esteem.

(D) Health issues in foster care.

(E) Accessing services and
 supports to address education needs, physical, mental, and behavioral health, and substance use disorders, including culturally relevant services.

(F) The rights of a child in foster care and the resource family’s responsibility to safeguard those rights, including the right to have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.

(G) Cultural needs of children, including instruction on cultural competency and sensitivity, and related best practices for providing adequate
 care for children or youth across diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds, as well as children or youth identifying as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender.

(H) Basic instruction on existing laws and procedures regarding the safety of foster youth at school.

(I) Permanence, well-being, and education needs of children.

(J) Child and adolescent development, including sexual orientation, gender identity, and expression.

(K) The role of resource families, including working cooperatively with the child welfare or probation agency, the child’s family, other resource families, and other service providers implementing the case plan, to support case plan goals and objectives,
 including placement transition planning to reduce trauma during transitions to reunification or other placement settings.

(L) The role of a resource family on the child and family team as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501.

(M) A resource family’s responsibility to act as a reasonable and prudent parent, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 1522.44 of the Health and Safety Code, and to provide a family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences and that serves the needs of the child.

(N) An overview of the specialized training identified in subdivision (h).

(O) The information described in subdivision (i) of Section 16521.5.
 The program may use the curriculum created pursuant to subdivision (h), and described in subdivision (i), of Section 16521.5.

(P) Information on providing care and supervision to children who have been commercially sexually exploited or who have been victims of child labor trafficking. For purposes of this subparagraph, “information” may include, but not be limited to, informational pamphlets addressing the identification of victims of commercial sexual exploitation and child labor trafficking and the provision of existing resources, including crisis hotline numbers, survivor and caregiver supports, and contact information for law enforcement entities.

(14) Ensuring resource families complete a minimum of eight hours of caregiver training annually, a portion of which shall be from
 subparagraph (M) of paragraph (13) and from one or more of the other topics listed in paragraph (13).

(15) (A) (i) Ensuring that resource families complete
 cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training and first aid training, or demonstrate equivalent certification, no later than 90 days following resource family approval.

(ii) A resource family parent who has a certificate of completion for Basic Life Support (BLS) for health care professionals, or Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS), or a higher standard of training that certifies CPR, and for whom the certification is currently active, is exempt from completing the resource family approval CPR training requirement as described in clause (i), upon demonstrating proof of certification of completion and until the date the certification expires.

(iii) A resource family parent who has active and unrestricted licensure as a health care professional, issued by the Department of
 Consumer Affairs or the Emergency Medical Services Authority, is exempt from completing the resource family approval first aid training requirement as described in clause (i), upon demonstrating proof of active and unrestricted licensure and until the date the licensure expires.

(B) (i) Ensuring that resource families, prior to expiration of the CPR and first aid certificates, obtain training to remain certified in CPR and first aid, or demonstrate equivalent certification, and submit copies of the certificates verifying completion of the training.

(ii) Clause (i) does not apply to first aid training for a resource family parent who is exempt from the first aid training requirement pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (A).

(16) (A) Ensuring that resource families that care for children who are 10 years of age or older attend, within 12 months of approval as a resource family, a training on understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to children who have been commercially sexually exploited or who have been victims of child labor trafficking. This training shall be survivor informed, culturally relevant and appropriate, and address issues relating to stigma. The training required by this subparagraph shall address all of the following topics:

(i) Recognizing indicators of commercial sexual exploitation and child labor trafficking.

(ii) Harm reduction.

(iii) Trauma-informed care.

(iv) Available county and state resources.

(v) Perspectives of individuals or families who have experiences with commercial sexual exploitation and child labor trafficking.

(B) The information provided in subparagraph (P) of paragraph (13) shall also be provided during the training described in this paragraph.

(C) After completing the training required by subparagraph (A), a resource family shall not be required to attend training relating to children who have been commercially sexually exploited or who have been victims of child labor trafficking, except as required pursuant to
 subdivision (h).

(D) This section does not prevent an entity from providing the training specified in this paragraph in person, virtually, by recorded means, or by any other available means.

(h) In addition to any training required by this section, a county may require a resource family or applicant to receive relevant
 specialized training for the purpose of preparing the resource family to meet the needs of a particular child in care. This training may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to commercially sexually exploited children and children who have been victims of child labor trafficking.

(2) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender children.

(3) Understanding the requirements and best practices regarding psychotropic medications, including, but not limited to, court authorization, benefits, uses, side effects, interactions, assistance with
 self-administration, misuse, documentation, storage, and metabolic monitoring of children prescribed psychotropic
 medications.

(4) Understanding the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), its historical significance, the rights of children covered by the act, and the best interests of Indian children, including the role of the caregiver in supporting culturally appropriate, child-centered practices that respect Native American history, culture, retention of tribal membership, and connection to the tribal community and traditions.

(5) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to nonminor dependents.

(6) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to children with special health care needs.

(7) Understanding the different permanency options and the services and benefits associated with the options.

(i) This section does not preclude a county from requiring training in excess of the requirements in this section.

(j) (1) Resource families who move home locations shall retain their resource family status pending the outcome of the update conducted pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (g).

(2) (A) If a resource family moves from one county to another county, the department, or the county to which a resource family has moved, shall submit a written request to the Department of Justice to transfer the individual’s subsequent arrest notification, as specified in
 subdivision (h) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A request to transfer a subsequent arrest notification shall contain all prescribed data elements and format protocols pursuant to a written agreement between the department and the Department of Justice.

(3) Subject to the requirements in paragraph (1), the resource family shall continue to be approved for guardianship and adoption. This subdivision shall not limit a county, foster family agency, or adoption agency from determining that the family is not approved for guardianship or adoption based on changes in the family’s circumstances or family evaluation.

(k) Implementation of the program shall be contingent upon the continued availability of
 federal Social Security Act Title IV-E (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670) funds for costs associated with placement of children with resource families assessed and approved pursuant to the program.

(l) A child placed with a resource family is eligible for the resource family basic rate, pursuant to Sections 11460, 11461, 11461.3, and 11463, at the child’s assessed level of care.

(m) Sharing ratios for nonfederal expenditures for all costs associated with activities related to the approval of relatives and nonrelative extended family members shall be in accordance with Section 10101.

(n) The Department of Justice shall charge fees sufficient to cover the cost of initial or subsequent criminal offender record information
 and Child Abuse Central Index searches, processing, or responses, as specified in this section.

(o) Except as provided, resource families shall be exempt from both of the following:

(1) Licensure requirements established pursuant to the California
 Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and all regulations promulgated to implement the act.

(2) Relative and nonrelative extended family member approval requirements as those approval requirements existed prior to January 1, 2017.

(p) (1) Early implementation counties shall be authorized to continue through December 31, 2016. The program shall be implemented by each county on or before January 1, 2017.

(2) (A) (i) On and after January 1, 2017, a county to which the department has delegated its licensing authority pursuant to Section 1511 of the Health and Safety Code
 shall approve resource families in lieu of licensing foster family homes.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the existing licensure and oversight processes shall continue to be administered for foster family homes licensed prior to January 1, 2017, or as specified in subparagraph (C), until the license is revoked or forfeited by operation of law pursuant to Section 1517.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) (i) On and after January 1, 2017, a county shall approve resource families in lieu of approving relative and nonrelative extended family members.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the existing approval and oversight processes shall continue to be administered for relatives and nonrelative
 extended family members approved prior to January 1, 2017, or as specified in subparagraph (C), until the approval is revoked or forfeited by operation of law pursuant to this section.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), a county shall approve or deny all applications for foster family home licenses and requests for relative or nonrelative extended family member approvals received on or before December 31, 2016, in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or provisions providing for the approval of relatives or nonrelative extended family members, as applicable.

(D) On and after January 1, 2017, a county shall not accept applications for foster family home licenses or requests to approve relatives or nonrelative
 extended family members.

(3) No later than July 1, 2019, each county shall provide the following information to all licensed foster family homes and approved relatives and nonrelative extended family members licensed or approved by the county:

(A) A detailed description of the resource family approval program.

(B) Notification that, in order to care for a foster child, resource family approval is required by December 31, 2020.

(C) Notification that a foster family home license and an approval of a relative or nonrelative extended family member shall be forfeited by operation of law, as specified in paragraph (8).

(4) The following applies to all licensed foster family homes and approved relative and nonrelative extended family members:

(A) A licensed foster family home or an approved relative or nonrelative extended family member with an approved adoptive home study completed prior to January 1, 2018, shall be deemed to be a resource family.

(B) A licensed foster family home or an approved relative or nonrelative extended family member who had a child in placement at any time between January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017, inclusive, may be approved as a resource family on the date of successful completion of a family evaluation.

(C) A licensed foster family home that provided county-authorized respite services at any
 time between January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017, inclusive, may be approved as a resource family on the date of successful completion of a family evaluation.

(5) A county may provide supportive services to all licensed foster family homes, relatives, and nonrelative extended family members with a child in placement to assist with the resource family transition and to minimize placement disruptions.

(6) (A) In order to approve a licensed foster family home or approved relative or nonrelative extended family member as a resource family pursuant to paragraph (4), a county shall submit a written request to the Department of Justice to transfer any subsequent arrest and Child Abuse Central Index notifications, as specified in subdivision (h) of
 Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A request to transfer a subsequent arrest notification shall contain all prescribed data elements and format protocols pursuant to a written agreement between the department and the Department of Justice.

(7) An individual who is a member of a resource family approved pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (4) shall be fingerprinted pursuant to Section 8712 of the Family Code upon filing an application for adoption.

(8) All foster family licenses and approvals of relatives and nonrelative extended family members shall be forfeited by operation of law on December 31, 2020, except as provided in this paragraph or Section 1524 of the Health and Safety Code:

(A) All licensed foster family homes that did not have a child in placement or did not provide county-authorized respite services at any time between January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017, inclusive, shall forfeit the license by operation of law on January 1, 2018.

(B) For foster family home licensees and approved relatives or nonrelative extended family members who have a pending resource family application on December 31, 2020, the foster family home license or relative and nonrelative extended family member approval shall be forfeited by operation of law upon approval as a resource family. If approval is denied, forfeiture by operation of law shall occur on the date of completion of any proceedings required by law to ensure due process.

(C) A foster family home license shall be forfeited by operation of law, pursuant to Section 1517.1 of the Health and Safety Code, upon approval as a resource family.

(D) Approval as a relative or nonrelative extended family member shall be forfeited by operation of law upon approval as a resource family.

(q) On and after January 1, 2017, all licensed foster family agencies shall approve resource families in lieu of certifying foster homes, as set forth in Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.

(r) The department may establish participation conditions, and select and authorize foster family agencies that voluntarily submit implementation plans and revised
 plans of operation in accordance with requirements established by the department, to approve resource families in lieu of certifying foster homes.

(1) Notwithstanding any other law, a participating foster family agency shall require resource families to meet and maintain the resource family approval standards and requirements set forth in this chapter and in the written directives adopted consistent with the chapter prior to approval and in order to maintain approval.

(2) A participating foster family agency shall implement the resource family approval program pursuant to Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) This section does not limit the authority of the department to inspect, evaluate, or investigate a
 complaint or incident, or initiate a disciplinary action against a foster family agency pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1550) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or to take any action it may deem necessary for the health and safety of children placed with the foster family agency.

(4) The department may adjust the foster family agency AFDC-FC rate pursuant to Section 11463 for implementation of this subdivision.

(5) This subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2017.

(s) The department or a county is authorized to obtain any arrest or conviction records or reports from any court or law enforcement agency as necessary to the performance of its duties, as provided in this section
 or subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(t) A resource family approved pursuant to this section shall forfeit its approval concurrent with resource family approval by a foster family agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 29.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.501.

A resource family approval shall be forfeited by operation of law when one of the following occurs:

(a) The resource family surrenders the approval to the county child welfare agency or probation department. 

(b) The sole resource family parent dies.

(c) The resource family abandons the approved home.

(d) The resource family fails to cooperate with a biennial update, as described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (g) of Section 16519.5, within 30 days of the date of written notice by the county child welfare agency or
 probation department.

(e) A resource family approval is forfeited by operation of law, as provided in Section 16519.58 of this code or Section 1517.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 104, Sec. 22.   (AB 2944)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.502.

(a) A portion of the annual resource family training shall support the case plans, goals, and needs of children in the resource family home, if there are any children in the home, in
 accordance with applicable written directives or regulations, as specified by the department.

(b) A county, in its discretion, may require a resource family or applicant to receive one or more hours of relevant specialized training that is in addition to the hours of that training that are required by state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 705, Sec. 1.   (AB 507)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.51.

(a) A person shall not incur civil liability as a result of a county notifying the department of its determination to rescind the approval of a resource family due to any of the following actions by a resource family parent:

(1) Violation of Section 16519.5, the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5, or any
 applicable law.

(2) Aiding, abetting, or permitting the violation of Section 16519.5, the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5, or any applicable law.

(3) Conduct that poses a risk or threat to the health and safety, protection, or well-being of a child, or the people of the state of California.

(4) The conviction of the applicant or resource family parent at any time before or during his or her approval of a crime described in Section 1522.

(5) Knowingly allowing any child to have illegal drugs, alcohol, or any tobacco product as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(6) Committing an act of child abuse or
 neglect or an act of violence against another person.

(b) The department or a county shall not incur civil liability for providing each other with information if the communication is for the purpose of aiding in the evaluation of an application for approval of a resource family.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 121.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.52.

(a) A resource family may install and use delayed egress devices of the time delay type in the home of the resource family.

(b) As used in this section, “delayed egress device” means a device that precludes the use of exits for a predetermined period of time. These devices shall not delay any resident’s departure from the home for longer than 30 seconds.

(c) Within the 30 seconds of delay, a resource family may attempt to redirect a resident who attempts to leave the home.

(d) Any person accepted by a resource family using delayed egress devices in the home shall meet all of the following conditions:

(1) The person shall have a developmental disability, as defined in Section 4512.

(2) The person shall be receiving services and case management from a regional center under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)).

(3) An interdisciplinary team, through the Individual Program Plan (IPP) process pursuant to Section 4646.5, shall have determined that the person lacks hazard awareness or
 impulse control and requires the level of supervision afforded by a resource family in a home equipped with delayed egress devices, and that, but for this placement, the person would be at risk of admission to, or would have no option but to remain in, a more restrictive state hospital or state developmental center placement.

(e) The home shall be subject to all fire and building codes, regulations, and standards applicable to residential care facilities for the elderly utilizing delayed egress devices, and shall receive approval by the county or city fire department, the local fire prevention district, or the State Fire Marshal for the installed delayed egress devices.

(f) The resource family shall provide training regarding the use and operation of the egress control devices used by any person caring for a resident, protection of residents’ personal rights, lack of hazard
 awareness and impulse control behavior, and emergency evacuation procedures.

(g) The resource family shall develop a plan of operation that is authorized by the approving county and includes a description of how the home is to be equipped with egress control devices that are consistent with regulations adopted by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 13143 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) The plan shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of how the resource family will provide training for persons caring for a resident regarding the use and operation of the egress control devices used in the home.

(2) A description of how the resource family will ensure the protection of the residents’ personal rights
 consistent with Sections 4502, 4503, and 4504.

(3) A description of how the resource family will manage the person’s lack of hazard awareness and impulse control behavior.

(4) A description of the resource family’s emergency evacuation procedures.

(i) Delayed egress devices shall not substitute for adequate supervision. The capacity of the home shall not exceed six residents.

(j) Emergency fire and earthquake drills shall be conducted at least once every three months, and shall include all persons providing resident care and supervision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 112.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.53.

(a) A resource family shall be authorized to administer emergency medical assistance and injections for severe diabetic hypoglycemia and anaphylactic shock to a foster child in placement in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1507.25 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A resource family shall be authorized to administer subcutaneous injections of other medications, including insulin, as
 prescribed by a child’s physician, to a foster child in placement in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1507.25 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 113.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.54.

Notwithstanding any other law, a resource family shall not be subject to civil penalties imposed pursuant to the Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 114.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.55.

(a) Subject to subdivision (d), to encourage the recruitment of resource families, to protect their personal privacy, and to preserve the security of confidentiality of the placements with resource families, the names, addresses, and other identifying information of resource families shall be considered personal information for purposes of the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code). This information shall not be disclosed by any state or local agency pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except as necessary for administering the resource family approval program,
 facilitating the placement of children with resource families, and providing names and addresses, upon request, only to bona fide professional foster parent organizations and to professional organizations educating foster parents, including the Foster and Kinship Care Education Program of the California Community Colleges.

(b) The application form signed by a resource family applicant of a county shall be signed with a declaration by the applicant that the information submitted is true, correct, and contains no material omissions of fact to the best knowledge and belief of the applicant. Any person who willfully and knowingly, with the intent to deceive, makes a false statement or fails to disclose a material fact in their application is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) (1) Before approving a resource family, a county may conduct a reference check of the applicant to determine whether it is safe and appropriate for the county to approve the applicant to be a resource family by contacting the following:

(A) Any foster family agencies that have certified the applicant.

(B) Any state or county licensing offices that have licensed the applicant as a foster family home.

(C) Any counties that have approved the applicant as a relative or nonrelative extended family member.

(D) Any foster family agencies or counties that have approved the applicant as a resource family.

(E) Any state licensing offices that have licensed the applicant as a community care facility, child daycare center, or family child care home.

(F) Any Indian tribe or tribal agency that has approved or licensed an applicant in any of the categories described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), within 20 business days of being contacted by a county, a foster family agency that has previously certified the applicant or approved the applicant as a resource family shall divulge information, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and unless otherwise prohibited by law, regarding the applicant to the county that is conducting
 a reference check.

(d) The department, a county, a foster family agency, an Indian tribe, or a tribal agency may request information from, or divulge information to, the department, a county, a foster family agency, an Indian tribe, or a tribal agency regarding a prospective resource family for the purpose of and as necessary to conduct a reference check to determine whether it is safe and appropriate to approve an applicant to be a resource family.

(e) For purposes of this section, the term Indian tribe means Indian tribe as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 460.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.555.

(a) The written report evaluating a resource family applicant’s capacity to foster, adopt, and provide legal guardianship of a child based on all of the information gathered through the resource family application and assessment processes, or any update to the written report, completed pursuant to Section 16519.5 of this code or Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code is confidential and may be released only to the following individuals and entities:

(1) The applicant or resource family.

(2) A tribal agency.

(3) The county
 child welfare agency or county probation department.

(4) The State Department of Social Services.

(5) A licensed foster family agency pursuant to Section 1517.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) A county adoption agency, as defined in Section 8513 of the Family Code, or a licensed adoption agency, as defined in Section 8530 of the Family Code.

(7) For the purpose of assessing the appropriateness of a placement or proposed placement pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, a member of the child welfare agency in the sending state.

(b) The written report, or any update to the
 written report, described in subdivision (a) shall not be further disseminated by the receiving individual or entity to any individual or entity, other than those individuals or agencies authorized to receive the written report pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), this section does not limit an applicant or resource family from disseminating those portions of the written report that relate to the applicant or resource family.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 47.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.56.

(a) (1) A county shall place a resource family on inactive status upon notification by the resource family in accordance with this section and the written directives or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(2) For purposes of this section, and notwithstanding Section 16519.5, “inactive status” means a period of time during which a resource family is not eligible to provide foster care for a child and is not subject to an approval update.

(b) The written directives or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 16519.5 shall include, but not be limited
 to, all of the following:

(1) The method by which a resource family shall notify a county of the following:

(A) A request to be placed on inactive status.

(B) A request to end inactive status.

(2) The actions to be taken by a county to end an inactive status.

(3) Any time limitations on inactive status.

(4) The circumstances under which a county shall conduct inspections of the home of a resource family during a period of inactive status.

(c) A resource family shall maintain all
 approval standards required by Section 16519.5 upon ending inactive status.

(d) This section does not limit the authority of the department to institute or continue an administrative action against a resource family or any individual residing or regularly present in the home of a resource family during a period of inactive status.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 104.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.57.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a resource family who has had a child either placed with them pursuant to order of the juvenile court or voluntarily placed with them by the person or persons having legal custody of the child, may give the same legal consent for that child as a parent, except for the following:

(1) Marriage.

(2) Entry into the Armed Forces of the United States.

(3) Medical and dental treatment, except that consent may be given for ordinary medical and dental treatment for the child, including, but not limited to, immunizations,
 physical examinations, and X-rays.

(4) Educational decisions that are required to be made by a child’s educational rights holder.

(5) If the child is voluntarily placed by the parent or parents, those items as are agreed to in writing by the parties to the placement.

(b) This section does not apply to any situation in which a juvenile court order expressly reserves the right to consent to those activities to the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 105.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.58.

(a) A resource family approved by a licensed foster family agency pursuant to Section 1517 or 1517.5 of the Health and Safety Code may transfer their approval to a county upon the successful completion of activities, as specified by the department, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The resource family shall complete the following activities:

(A) Submit to the county information necessary to initiate the transfer process on a form specified by the department.

(B) Authorize the county to request that clearances and exemptions issued to the resource family and all adults residing or regularly
 present in the home be transferred from the department to the county pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Cooperate with the county in conducting an approval update, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(2) (A) The county shall complete the following activities:

(i) With respect to notifications issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code and Section 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code, submit a request to the Department of Justice as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (h) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Complete an approval update for the resource family
 as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(I) The county shall request a copy of the written report completed pursuant to Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code, any updates to the written report regarding the resource family, and documents in the resource family case record, including any updates to the resource family case record, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted by the department, from the licensed foster family agency.

(II) The licensed foster family agency shall forward a copy of the written report completed pursuant to Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code, any updates to the written report regarding the resource family, and documents in the resource family case record, including any updates to the resource family case record, as specified in the written directives or
 regulations adopted by the department, to the county within 20 business days of receipt of the request.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a county shall not approve or deny an application if there is a pending investigation that poses a health and safety risk or pending administrative action against the applicant or an adult residing in the home, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 16519.5.
